Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 11

Senior Arkansans Hall of Fame

13-11-101. Creation.

In order to honor the significant contributions of older Arkansans, there is now created the Senior Arkansans Hall of Fame.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1218, § 1.

13-11-102. Administration — Rules.

(a)

The Senior Arkansans Hall of Fame shall be administered by the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services, in consultation with the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs.

(b)

The division will promulgate rules to implement the hall of fame and to select candidates for inclusion.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1218, § 2; 2017, No. 913, § 39.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Aging and Adult Services” and “House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative, and Military Affairs” for “Joint Interim Committee on Aging and Legislative Affairs”.